Alabama, session 2026rs, HB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "female genital mutilation" means to remove, cut,
circumcise, excise, mutilate, infibulate, or reinfibulate, in
whole or in part, the labia majora, labia minora, or clitoris
of a female under 19 years of age. The term includes a
Page 1

of a female under 19 years of age. The term includes a
HB644 INTRODUCED
clitoridectomy. The term also includes any other harmful
procedure to the female genitalia for nonmedical purposes,
including incising, piercing, scraping, nicking, cauterizing,
burning, and scarring.
(b) An individual is guilty of a Class B felony if he
or she does any of the following:
(1) Commits female genital mutilation on a female under
19 years of age.
(2) Is a parent, legal guardian, or has immediate
custody or control of a female under 19 years of age and
knowingly allows, authorizes, or directs another individual to
commit female genital mutilation on the female.
(3) Knowingly removes or causes or permits the removal
of a female under 19 years of age from this state for the
purpose of committing or allowing, authorizing, or directing
another individual to commit female genital mutilation.
(c) An individual under 19 years of age is incapable of
consenting to female genital mutilation.
(d) It is not a defense to subsection (b) that the
conduct is required as a matter of religion, custom, ritual,
or standard practice, or that the female on whom the conduct
is performed, or the parent or legal guardian of the female,
consented to the act.
(e) This section does not apply to procedures performed
by or under the direction of a licensed physician when
determined to be medically necessary to preserve the physical
health of the female.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
Page 2

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
HB644 INTRODUCED
establish a standard of care for hospitals or physicians or
otherwise modify, amend, or supersede any provision of the
Alabama Medical Liability Act of 1987 or the Alabama Medical
Liability Act of 1996, or any amendment or judicial
interpretation of either act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective June 1,
2026.
Page 3